Alaska statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 1. Common Law.

Collateral references. —

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, § 1 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 01.10.010.
Applicability of common law.

So much of the common law not inconsistent with the Constitution of the State of Alaska or the Constitution of the United States or with any law passed by the legislature of the State of Alaska is the rule of decision in this state.

History.

(§ 2-12 ACLA 1949; § 65-1-3 ACLA 1949)

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is considerable authority at common law which defines the scope of permissible trust investment. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.